Washington statutes.
RCW 18.44.450

Referral fees prohibited—Consumer protection act—Application.

(1) "Real property lender" as used in this section means a bank, savings bank, savings and loan association, credit union, mortgage company, or other corporation, association, or partnership that makes loans secured by real property located in this state.

(2) No real property lender, escrow agent, or officer or employee of any escrow agent or real property lender may give or agree to pay or give any money, service, or object of value to any real estate agent or broker, to any real property lender, or to any officer or employee of any agent, broker, or lender in return for the referral of any real estate escrow services. Nothing in this subsection prohibits the payment of fees or other compensation permitted under the federal Real Estate Settlement Procedures Act as amended (12 U.S.C. sections 2601 through 2617).

(3) The legislature finds that the practices governed by this subsection are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. Any violation of this section is not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business and is an unfair and deceptive act or practice and an unfair method of competition in the conduct of trade or commerce in violation of RCW 19.86.020. Remedies provided by chapter 19.86 RCW are cumulative and not exclusive.

[ 2000 c 171 s 17; 1999 c 30 s 33; 1988 c 178 s 3. Formerly RCW 18.44.145.]

NOTES:

Severability—1988 c 178: See note following RCW 18.44.400.